Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.310

Property subject to seizure and forfeiture.

The following are subject to seizure and forfeiture and no property right exists in them:

(1) All tangible or intangible property, including any right or interest in such property, acquired by a person convicted of a crime for which there is a victim of the crime and to the extent the acquisition is the direct or indirect result of the convicted person having committed the crime. Such property includes but is not limited to the convicted person's remuneration for, or contract interest in, any reenactment or depiction or account of the crime in a movie, book, magazine, newspaper or other publication, audio recording, radio or television presentation, live entertainment of any kind, or any expression of the convicted person's thoughts, feelings, opinions, or emotions regarding the crime.

(2) Any property acquired through the traceable proceeds of property described in subsection (1) of this section.

[ 1993 c 288 s 4.]